Indiana, session 2026, HB1181.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 2-5-55 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]:
Chapter 55. Access to Counsel in Eviction Task Force
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "task force" refers to the access
to counsel in eviction task force established by section 2 of this
chapter.
Sec. 2. The access to counsel in eviction task force is established
as a temporary task force serving the general assembly.
Sec. 3. (a) The task force consists of the following twelve (12)
members, all of whom are voting members:
(1) A member of the house appointed by the speaker.
(2) A member of the house appointed by the minority leader
of the house.
(3) A member of the senate appointed by the president pro
tempore of the senate.
(4) A member of the senate appointed by the minority leader
2026 IN 1181—LS 6585/DI 129


of the senate.
(5) A member representing the Indiana Public Defender
Council, appointed by the governor.
(6) A member representing the Indiana State Bar Association,
appointed by the governor.
(7) A member representing the Fair Housing Center of
Central Indiana, appointed by the governor.
(8) A member representing the Indiana Apartment
Association, appointed by the governor.
(9) A member representing a tenant advocacy group,
appointed by the speaker.
(10) A member who is a judge who presides over eviction
cases in Indiana, appointed by the president pro tempore of
the senate.
(11) Two (2) members whose income does not exceed fifty
percent (50%) of the state median income adjusted for
household size, appointed as follows:
(A) One (1) member appointed by the minority leader of
the house.
(B) One (1) member appointed by the minority leader of
the senate.
(b) The members appointed under subsection (a)(1) and (a)(3)
shall serve as co-chairs of the task force for the duration of the task
force.
(c) A member of the task force serves for the duration of the
task force. However, a member of the task force, including each
co-chair of the task force, serves at the will of the member's
appointing authority.
(d) Appointing authorities shall appoint the members of the task
force not later than June 1, 2026.
Sec. 4. (a) The task force shall meet at the call of the co-chairs.
(b) The task force shall meet for the first time not later than
August 1, 2026.
(c) Seven (7) members of the task force constitute a quorum.
(d) The affirmative votes of a majority of the members of the
task force are required for the task force to take action on any
measure, including adoption of the report under section 7(2) of this
chapter.
(e) All meetings of the task force are open to the public in
accordance with and subject to IC 5-14-1.5. All records of the task
force are subject to the requirements of IC 5-14-3.
Sec. 5. (a) A lay or legislative member of the task force is
2026 IN 1181—LS 6585/DI 129


entitled to receive the same per diem, mileage, and travel
allowances paid to legislative members of interim study committees
established by the legislative council.
(b) A member of the task force who is:
(1) a state employee; and
(2) not a member of the general assembly;
is not entitled to a per diem. However, the member is entitled to
reimbursement for traveling expenses as provided under
IC 4-13-1-4 and other expenses actually incurred in connection
with the member's duties as provided in the state policies and
procedures established by the Indiana department of
administration and approved by the budget agency.
Sec. 6. The legislative services agency shall staff the task force.
The task force shall operate under the policies and rules of the
legislative council.
Sec. 7. The task force shall do the following:
(1) Conduct a study of:
(A) the eviction process throughout Indiana and the
performance of designated organizations and community
groups that provide eviction relief services; and
(B) potential funding sources to increase access to counsel
to represent a tenant subject to an eviction proceeding.
(2) Not later than November 15, 2026, adopt and submit to the
executive director of the legislative services agency, for
distribution to the legislative council, a report that includes
the following:
(A) The results of the task force's study under subdivision
(1).
(B) The task force's recommendations with regard to state
policies, including any recommended legislation, to provide
a tenant with increased access to counsel in an eviction
proceeding.
The report must be submitted in an electronic format under
IC 5-14-6.
Sec. 8. This chapter expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 2. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1181—LS 6585/DI 129